Mississippi, session 2026, SB2509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi School Resource Officers School Safety Act." SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless context or use requires otherwise: (a)  "Act" means the "Mississippi School Resource Officers School Safety Act." (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. (c)  "Local law enforcement agency" means the local police department or county sheriff's office that has primary law enforcement authority over the schools within its jurisdiction. (d)  "Independent school" means a nonpublic school operating within the State of Mississippi that: (i)  Is a member of the Midsouth Association of Independent Schools (MAIS) and located in the State of Mississippi; (ii)  Is accredited by a state, regional or national accrediting organization, including the State Board of Education; and (iii)  Is not subject to the purview of authority of the State Board of Education, unless such school is accredited by the board. (e) "Program" means the Mississippi School Resource Officers School Safety program, established in and administered by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. (f)  "School governing body" means: (i)  The local school board of a public school district; (ii)  The charter school governing board of a charter school; and (iii)  The board or other governing body of an accredited independent school, as such governing body is prescribed in the charter, bylaws or other governing documents of the independent school. (g)  "School resource officer" or "SRO" means a sworn law enforcement officer employed by a local law enforcement agency and assigned to public or private elementary or secondary school campuses to provide community policing efforts to combat school violence and improve student and school safety in or on the property of the school campus to which he or she is assigned. SECTION 3. (1)  There is hereby established the Mississippi School Resource Officers School Safety program in the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to provide funding to assist local law enforcement agencies in providing school resource officers (SROs) to all public and private elementary and secondary school campuses within the jurisdictions over which such agencies have primary law enforcement authority for the purpose of providing enhanced security and community policing in and around all elementary and secondary schools therein. (2)  The program shall meet the following requirements and standards: (a)  The program shall provide an incentive for law enforcement agencies to build collaborative partnerships with the school community and to use community policing efforts to combat school violence and implement educational programs to improve student and school safety; (b)  The department shall provide the funds under the authority of this act for the administration of the program to provide the cost associated with the employment of one (1) school resource officer (SRO) by a local law enforcement agency for each school campus within the jurisdiction over which the agency has primary law enforcement authority, to be applied towards the SRO's salary and benefits, training, equipment and other costs deemed necessary by the local law enforcement agency and school governing authority to enable the SRO to perform his or her duties in and around elementary and secondary schools; (c)  Local law enforcement agencies and school governing bodies shall make joint application to the department for funds under the authority of subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of funding the employment of SROs.  The joint application submitted by the local law enforcement agency and school governing body shall, at a minimum: (i)  Identify the local law enforcement agency to provide the school resource officers, and the name of chief law enforcement officer of the agency; (ii)  Identify the school governing body to be served by the local law enforcement agency, and the names of the president of such governing body and the superintendent or head of schools under the governing body's authority and control; (iii)  The total number of schools, the total number of school campuses and the names of all schools under the school's governing body's authority and control; (iv)  The names of the principals of each school under the school's governing body's authority and control; (v)  The name, address and phone number of each school campus to be served a school resource officer (SRO); (vi)  The proposed salary of each school resource officer (SRO); and (vii)  The approximate number of school resource officers (SROs) necessary for employment to accomplish the goal of assigning one (1) SRO to each school campus as required by this act; (d)  The local law enforcement agency and the appropriate school governing body shall enter into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) or an interlocal agreement, signed by the chief law enforcement officer and the appropriate school officials, which provides: (i)  Documentation of the roles and responsibilities to be undertaken by the law enforcement agency and the educational school partners through this collaborative effort; (ii)  That school resource officers (SROs) will be official employees of the local law enforcement agency that has primary law enforcement authority over the schools within its jurisdiction; (iii)  A Narrative Addendum to document that school resource officers (SROs) will be assigned to work in and around public and private elementary or secondary school campuses and provide supporting documentation in the following areas: 1.  Problem identification and justification; 2.  Community policing strategies to be used by the SROs; 3.  Quality and level of commitment to the effort; and 4.  The link to community policing; and (e)  Upon the employment of an individual to serve as a school resource officer under the provisions of this act, the employing school district, in conjunction with said school resource officer, shall complete the development and/or enhancement of a comprehensive school safety plan for each school campus in the school district under the school resource officer's enforcement authority within sixty (60) days of the approval of the individual's employment by the local school governing authority.  Before the expiration of the sixty-day period, the local school governing authority shall provide copies of the comprehensive school safety plan to the local law enforcement agency having primary law enforcement authority over each school impacted by the school safety plan(s) within their jurisdiction, and to the Department of Public Safety. (3)  School districts and school-affiliated organizations, including booster clubs and PTOs, may compensate sworn law enforcement officers for providing security at school-sponsored events. (4)  Officers may wear official agency uniforms and use assigned vehicles and equipment. (5)  School resource officers (SROs) may serve in a variety of roles, including, but not limited to, that of a law enforcement officer, safety specialist, law-related educator, problem-solver and community liaison.  These officers may teach programs such as crime prevention, substance abuse prevention and gang resistance, as well as monitor and assist troubled students through mentoring programs.  The SROs may also identify physical changes in the environment that may reduce crime in and around school campuses, as well as assist in developing school policies which address criminal activity and school safety. (6)  All agencies receiving funds through the Mississippi School Resource Officers School Safety program are required to send the individuals employed as school resource officers (SROs) to the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy or a law enforcement training academy approved by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, where they shall be required to participate in training through the Advanced Law Enforcement Rapid Response Training Program at such academy. (7)  The Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations prescribing procedures for the application, expenditure requirements and the administration of the Mississippi Community Oriented Policing Services in Schools program established in this section, and shall make a report on the implementation of the MS ROSS program with any recommendations to the 2027 Regular Session of the Legislature. SECTION 4. There is created in the State Treasury a special fund, to be designated as the "Mississippi School Resource Officers School Safety Fund," which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. Monies in the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the Department of Public Safety, to provide funds to local law enforcement agencies and school governing bodies for the purposes described in this section.  The department may use an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the monies in the fund, not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00), for the purpose of defraying the costs of the department in administering the program. SECTION 5.  Section 37-7-321, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-7-321.  (1)  (a)  The school board of any school district within the State of Mississippi, in its discretion, may employ one or more persons as security personnel and may designate such persons as peace officers in or on any property operated for school purposes by such board upon their taking such oath and making such bond as required of a constable of the county in which the school district is situated. (b)  Local law enforcement agencies having primary law enforcement authority over schools within their jurisdiction, in conjunction with the school boards of every school district within the State of Mississippi, through a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) or interlocal agreement, signed by the law enforcement executive and the appropriate school official(s), shall employ  individuals to serve as school resource officers (SROs), provided that the MOU or interlocal agreement shall require a minimum of one (1) school resource officer to be assigned to each school campus operating under the authority and control of the local school board. (2)  Any person employed by a school board as a security guard or school resource officer (SRO) or in any other position that has the powers of a peace officer, who is not a sworn law enforcement officer, must receive a minimum level of basic law enforcement training, as jointly determined and prescribed by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training and the State Board of Education, within two (2) years of the person's initial employment in such position. * * *  Upon  The failure of any person employed in such position to receive the required training within the designated time * * *, the person may not will result in the withdrawal of that person's authority to exercise the powers of a peace officer in or on the property of the school district. (3)  The school board is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, and subject to the approval of the Federal Communications Commission, to install and operate a noncommercial radio broadcasting and transmission station for educational and vocational educational purposes. (4)  If a law enforcement officer is duly appointed to be a peace officer by a school district under this section, the local school board may enter into an interlocal agreement with other law enforcement entities for the provision of equipment or traffic control duties * * *,; however, the duty to enforce traffic regulations and to enforce the laws of the state or municipality off of school property lies with the local police or sheriff's department which cannot withhold its services solely because of the lack of such an agreement. (5)  (a)  During any period of the regular scholastic year or extended school year programs in which academic instruction is being provided to students upon the campuses of a public and private elementary or secondary schools, school resource officers, employed by a local law enforcement agency to provide community policing efforts to combat school violence and improve student and school safety, shall maintain an active and visible presence upon the school campus to which he or she is assigned under the program defined in Section 1 of this act.  For purposes of this section, "regular scholastic year" means the minimum one hundred eighty (180) days which public schools are required to be kept in session under Section 37-13-63 to constitute a scholastic year.  "Extended school year programs" means those programs authorized by law, which extend beyond the one-hundred-eighty-day term of a regular scholastic year, including summer school instruction.  In the performance of his or her duties, a school resource officer shall report for duty on the campus of the school of assignment not later than one (1) hour before the start of each school day on Monday through Friday, and remain thereon for one (1) hour after the conclusion of normal daily instruction.  No school resource officer shall be required to work on Saturday or Sunday, unless a school-sponsored event is hosted upon the school campus which the school resource officer has been assigned, which such events shall include extracurricular and cocurricular activities. (b)  When school is not in session (i.e. holidays, summer vacation, fall breaks, declarations of emergency which suspend the requirements for school attendance, etc.), the school resource officer shall report to his or her immediate supervisor within the local law enforcement agency of employment for further assignment of duties that are directly related to activities and functions of the local law enforcement agency. (c)  Notwithstanding a school resource officer's permanent employment with the local law enforcement agency with whom a local school governing authority has entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) or an interlocal agreement for the assignment of a school resource officer, the employing local law enforcement agency shall not require a school resource officer to leave his or her assigned post at a school during the time specified for the performance of his or her duties as prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection to perform work duties directly related to activities and functions of the local law enforcement agency, unless it has been determined by the chief law enforcement officer of the employing agency that an emergency exists. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.